Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

Emergency Government Relocation

7-51-101. Emergency location of local government.

Whenever, due to an emergency resulting from the effects of enemy attack, or the anticipated effects of a threatened enemy attack, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient or impossible to conduct the affairs of local government at the regular or usual place or places of the conduct of the affairs of government, the governing body of each political subdivision of this state may meet at any place within or without the territorial limits of such political subdivisions on the call of the presiding officer or any two (2) members of such governing body, and shall proceed to establish and designate by ordinance, resolution or other manner, alternate or substitute sites or places as the emergency temporary location or locations of government where all or any part of the public business may be transacted and conducted during the emergency situation. Such sites or places may be within or without the territorial limits of such political subdivision and may be within or without this state.

Acts 1961, ch. 319, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-115.

Attorney General Opinions. Cities and counties lack statutory authority to regulate mortgage transactions, OAG 03-016, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/11/03).

7-51-102. Power to act at emergency location.

During the period when the public business is being conducted at the emergency temporary location or locations, the governing body and other officers of a political subdivision of this state shall have and possess and shall exercise, at such location or locations, all of the executive, legislative and judicial powers and functions conferred upon such body and officers by or under the laws of this state. Such powers and functions may be exercised in the light of the exigencies of the emergency situation without regard to or compliance with time consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law and pertaining thereto, and all acts of such body and officers shall be as valid and binding as if performed within the territorial limits of their political subdivision.

Acts 1961, ch. 319, § 2; T.C.A., § 5-116.

7-51-103. Provisions control other laws.

This part shall control and be supreme in the event it shall be employed, notwithstanding any statutory, charter or ordinance provision to the contrary or in conflict herewith.

Acts 1961, ch. 319, § 3; T.C.A., § 5-117.

Cross-References. Retirement benefits upon death in line of duty, §8-36-108.